District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.24

Duties of Harbor Master.

(a)

The Harbor Master shall retain the evidence used to establish the accuracy of the information in its files relating to the current ownership of a vessel and the information on the certificate of title.

(b)

The Harbor Master shall retain in its files all information regarding a security interest in a vessel for at least 10 years after the Harbor Master receives a termination statement regarding the security interest. The information shall be accessible by the hull identification number for the vessel and any other methods provided by the Harbor Master.

(c)

If a person submits a record to the Harbor Master, or submits information that is accepted by the Harbor Master, and requests an acknowledgment of the filing or submission, the Harbor Master shall send to the person an acknowledgment showing the hull identification number of the vessel to which the record or submission relates, the information in the filed record or submission, and the date and time the record was received or the submission accepted. A request under this section shall contain the hull identification number and be delivered by means authorized by the Harbor Master.

(d)

The Harbor Master shall send or otherwise make available in a record the following information to any person that requests it and pays the applicable fee:

(1)

Whether the files of the Harbor Master indicate, as of a date and time specified by the Harbor Master, but not a date earlier than 3 days before the Harbor Master received the request, any certificate of title, security interest, termination statement, or title brand that relates to a vessel:

(A)

Identified by a hull identification number designated in the request;

(B)

Identified by a vessel number designated in the request; or

(C)

Owned by a person designated in the request;

(2)

With respect to the vessel:

(A)

The name and address of any owner as indicated in the files of the Harbor Master or on the certificate of title;

(B)

The name and address of any secured party as indicated in the files of the Harbor Master or on the certificate of title, and the effective date of the information; and

(C)

A copy of any termination statement indicated in the files of the Harbor Master and the effective date of the termination statement; and

(3)

With respect to the vessel, a copy of any certificate of origin, secured party transfer statement, transfer-by-law statement under § 50-1541.19, and other evidence of previous or current transfers of ownership.

(e)

In responding to a request under this section, the Harbor Master may provide the requested information in any medium. On request, the Harbor Master shall send the requested information in a record that bears the seal of the Harbor Master and is attested to by an appropriate official.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 25, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.